Massachusetts, session 194th, HD6284.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 40 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 72. (a) As used in this section, the following terms shall, unless the context 
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings: 
“Property owner”, any individual, business entity or organization that has legal title, care, 
charge or control of property or the buildings or structure thereon. 
“Vacant property”, any commercial property with land of 5 acres or more, and any 
building or structure thereupon, that is not being used or occupied. 
(b) No property owner shall, intentionally or through neglect, allow vacant property to 
negatively impact the surrounding neighborhood or community. 
(c) A city or town may file a petition to enforce subsection (b) in district, housing or 
superior court. The court may: (i) issue temporary restraining orders or preliminary or permanent 

of 2 12 injunctions; (ii) order the property owner to pay a fine of not more than $100,000; and (iii) 
compel the sale of the vacant property.